California, session 20252026, SB511.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8995 of the Education Code is amended to read:8995. The Legislature encourages school administrations to do the following:(a) Offer wellness programs that include personalized instruction about healthy eating and physical activity.(b) Ensure that the nutrition services, health services, and social services children pupils need in order to learn are provided at the schoolsite or in cooperation with other community agencies.(c) If the school maintains an internet website, post on the school’s internet website information about community programs that offer nutrition assistance to families.